Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ast_ES.dic
abelecáu/ABF
abobáu/ABF
absurdu/ABF
acabalgáu/ABF
acastañáu/ABF
aceñeru/ABF
achornosu/ABF
acoladáu/ABF
acongoxador/AF
acreitativu/ABF
acústicu/ABF
adomaderu/ABF
aereu/ABF
afardeláu/ABF
afesoriáu/ABF
afogadizu/ABF
afrañáu/ABF
agallegáu/ABF
agoreru/ABF
agru/ABF
aguiyador/AF
albanés/AF
alcanzáu/ABF
alforxu/ABF
alitordu/ABF
alleonáu/ABF
alministrador/AF
altrocáu/ABF
amanadizu/ABF
amaricáu/ABF
ambiguu/ABF
aminguláu/ABF
amorosu/ABF
analayeru/ABF
andoleru/ABF
anestésicu/ABF
animador/AF
antepenúltimu/ABF
antipáticu/ABF
antropófagu/ABF
apaciguador/AF
aparaguáu/ABF
apegón/AF
apetecederu/ABF
apócrifu/ABF
apostador/AF
apuñalador/AF
arbáu/ABF
areneru/ABF
argomión/AF
aroxu/ABF
arrampuñador/AF
arrechu/ABF
arrenegáu/ABF
arrobador/AF
arruinador/AF
aruñador/AF
asiáticu/ABF
asonsañón/AF
asturianu/ABF
ateníu/ABF
atoliscáu/ABF
atrasáu/ABF
atroxáu/ABF
austeru/ABF
autoxestionariu/ABF
averador/AF
axampanáu/ABF
axugador/AF
azolador/AF
babayu/BF
baillarín/F
bandíu/BF
bárbaru/BF
barredor/F
bartolu/BF
batallador/F
bebidón/F
benedictín/F
berriacu/BF
bicicleteru/BF
bigotudu/BF
bipartitu/BF
bisiestu/BF
blandiu/BF
bocabiertu/BF
boleru/BF
boronchu/BF
bovín/F
brazáu/BF
broucu/BF
bufón/F
burllón/F
caballunu/BF
cabrizu/BF
cachazudu/BF
cadañeru/BF
cagaleratu/BF
calabazón/F
calcográficu/BF
calefautor/F
callandín/F
calzamiñáu/BF
camellu/BF
canariu/BF
candorriu/BF
cantador/F
capelludu/BF
carbiesu/BF
cardín/F
caritativu/BF
carpiolón/F
carruchudu/BF
cascantín/F
castu/BF
catódicu/BF
cayuelu/BF
cefálicu/BF
celosu/BF
centígradu/BF
cercanu/BF
cetrín/F
chaparretu/BF
charquizu/BF
chirchón/F
churrusqueru/BF
cinemáticu/BF
clandestín/F
cocinador/F
combativu/BF
completu/BF
confirmador/F
contaperu/BF
conxustón/F
coreanu/BF
correutu/BF
cosméticu/BF
creador/F
cuadranguláu/BF
cucu/BF
cúpricu/BF
dágaru/BF
decimosestu/BF
demostrativu/BF
desafaitáu/BF
descaráu/BF
desgaxáu/BF
despuntiáu/BF
diastólicu/BF
direutivu/BF
divisoriu/BF
dormidor/F
duru/BF
ellaborador/AF
emburriador/AF
empicador/AF
encadenáu/ABF
encefálicu/ABF
endiabláu/ABF
engañador/AF
engurribináu/ABF
enrollador/AF
entelegáu/ABF
envaporáu/ABF
epicureu/ABF
esbandayón/AF
escacarañáu/ABF
escampudu/ABF
escarnáu/ABF
esclusivu/ABF
escorteyador/AF
escultóricu/ABF
esfilandraxáu/ABF
esgatuñador/AF
esllamiáu/ABF
esmanicáu/ABF
esmorgañáu/ABF
esparrabanáu/ABF
esperteyáu/ABF
esportador/AF
estampanáu/ABF
estolináu/ABF
estratosféricu/ABF
esvaíu/ABF
eufóricu/ABF
facháu/BF
fallíu/BF
faragayu/BF
farolu/BF
fedésticu/BF
ferruñosu/BF
filosóficu/BF
floriáu/BF
forasteru/BF
fotolitográficu/BF
frebosu/BF
fumientu/BF
gadañón/F
galu/BF
garbanciegu/BF
gaseosu/BF
gazmuñu/BF
gollón/F
grandalés/F
grisón/F
güérfanu/BF
gustosu/BF
hematóxenu/BF
híbridu/BF
histriónicu/BF
humorísticu/BF
impidíu/ABF
incontroláu/ABF
inespecíficu/ABF
inseguru/ABF
intranquilu/ABF
islámicu/ABF
letón/F
lladrador/F
llambisquín/F
llanzador/F
llatón/F
llerzosu/BF
llimáu/BF
llívidu/BF
lloramicu/BF
lluniegu/BF
machucador/F
magnéticu/BF
malintencionáu/BF
manditu/BF
mantegueru/BF
marfayu/BF
marón/F
matutín/F
medianeru/BF
melindrosu/BF
mesiánicu/BF
mexicanu/BF
millonavu/BF
mitómanu/BF
mollentón/F
montexu/BF
moricu/BF
mosquetáu/BF
multimillonariu/BF
nachu/BF
necrófagu/BF
netu/BF
nórdicu/BF
nuevu/BF
ñidiu/BF
ofensivu/ABF
oreyudu/ABF
ovaláu/ABF
paleontolóxicu/BF
panchu/BF
pañador/F
parasicolóxicu/BF
paródicu/BF
pastosu/BF
patoxu/BF
pecadosu/BF
peláu/BF
pensativu/BF
perguntón/F
persiguidor/F
pian/F
piecu/BF
pintiaráu/BF
pizarrosu/BF
pluviométricu/BF
polirrítmicu/BF
porgoyosu/BF
pragmáticu/BF
prerrománticu/BF
privativu/BF
proteínicu/BF
pulmonientu/BF
quemón/F
rabiceru/BF
radiográficu/BF
rancollu/BF
raru/BF
rebeldiáu/BF
receutivu/BF
refalfión/F
reguilu/BF
remolón/F
repintu/BF
resbalín/F
resquemáu/BF
retroflexu/BF
rexenerativu/BF
rítmicu/BF
roncu/BF
ruinosu/BF
sacarín/F
salmoneru/BF
santu/BF
sayetu/BF
segunderu/BF
sensitivu/BF
serranu/BF
sicopáticu/BF
simiescu/BF
sirgu/BF
socráticu/BF
solu/BF
sórbicu/BF
sucedaneu/BF
supersónicu/BF
tácticu/BF
tañín/F
tartagueru/BF
telegráficu/BF
teóricu/BF
testeru/BF
tipolóxicu/BF
tomográficu/BF
torgáu/BF
toyosu/BF
trancabirláu/BF
traxeáu/BF
tresneváu/BF
tristuríu/BF
trusgu/BF
turroneru/BF
urdidor/AF
válidu/BF
vendedor/F
verdinegru/BF
vesíu/BF
villandiegu/BF
vivu/BF
xacareru/BF
xelatinosu/BF
xerárquicu/BF
xipleru/BF
xostrosu/BF
yodáu/BF
zamploñu/BF
zarafollón/F
zatarosu/BF
zurráu/BF
